Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1903
Development district; policy board.

Each development district formed pursuant to section 13-1902 shall be governed by a policy board, as described in the development district's interlocal cooperation agreement or bylaws, which shall be the board, body, or persons in which the powers of the local governments forming the development district are vested under the agreement for the purpose of governing the development district.

Laws 1992, LB 573, § 3.